District of Columbia statutes.
42-3608

Court costs and attorney’s fees.

The Court may award court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to a civic association, community association, or resident association that is the prevailing plaintiff in an action brought under this subchapter.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 1309, 47 DCR 6308
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 1309 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1309 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).